Arkansas, session 2025, SB398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) When establishing the legislative branch of government in
the Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, the people of Arkansas reserved in the
first section of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5 the legislative powers of
initiative and referendum for themselves;
(2) Article 5, § 1 of the Arkansas Constitution specifically
states, in part, that the “first power reserved by the people is the
initiative” and the “second power reserved by the people is the referendum”;
(3) Article 5, § 1 of the Arkansas Constitution also
specifically states, in part, that “If the Secretary of State ... shall
decide any petition to be insufficient, he or she shall without delay notify
the sponsors of such petition, and permit at least thirty (30) days from the
date of such notification ... for correction or amendment”; and
*SSS007*
03/06/2025 9:51:51 AM SSS007

SB398
(4) The General Assembly enacts this legislation to clarify the
intent and support the spirit of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-111, concerning the determination of
the sufficiency of a petition, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(j)(1) If, while ascertaining and declaring the sufficiency or
insufficiency of a statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum
petition, or the signatures in support of such a petition, the Secretary of
State determines that the petition, or signatures in support of the petition,
are insufficient for any reason, the Secretary of State shall immediately
notify the sponsor in writing through his or her designated agent and shall
identify the insufficiency.
(2) The sponsor shall have thirty (30) days from the date of the
delivery of the notice from the Secretary of State to cure the insufficiency
identified under subdivision (j)(1) of this section to the Secretary of
State.
(3) The Secretary of State shall ascertain and declare the
sufficiency or insufficiency of each petition or signature resubmitted under
subdivision (j)(2) of this section within ten (10) days of the resubmission
of the petition or signature and notify the sponsor whether the resubmitted
petition or signature is sufficient or insufficient.
(4) If the Secretary of State determines that the petition or
any number of signatures resubmitted under subdivision (j)(2) of this section
are sufficient, he or she shall proceed with the processing of the petition
or with the counting of signatures that were not counted due to the
determination of insufficiency by the Secretary of State.
(5) For all signatures determined to be insufficient under
subdivision (j)(1) of this section, if feasible, the Secretary of State shall
also immediately notify an individual who signed the petition that his or her
signature was found to be insufficient.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-9-126(b), concerning verification of
signatures, is amended to read as follows:
(b) A Except as provided in § 7-9-111(j), a petition part and all
signatures appearing on the petition part shall not be counted for any
03/06/2025 9:51:51 AM SSS007

SB398
purpose by the official charged with verifying the signatures, including the
initial count of signatures, if one (1) or more of the following is true:

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-9-126(d), concerning the initial count of
signatures, is amended to read as follows:
(d) If Except as provided in § 7-9-111(j), if the initial count of
signatures under this section is less than the designated number of
signatures required by the Arkansas Constitution and statutory law in order
to certify the measure for the ballot and the deadline for filing petitions
has passed, the official charged with verifying the signatures shall declare
the petition insufficient and shall not accept and file any additional
signatures to cure the insufficiency of the petition on its face.
























03/06/2025 9:51:51 AM SSS007